Utah statutes.
31A-37-104.   Applicability of reorganization, receivership, and injunction
authority.
(1)  Except as provided in Chapter 37a, Special Purpose Financial Captive
Insurance Company Act, and Subsection (2), Chapter 27a, Insurer Receivership
Act, applies to a captive insurance company formed or holding a certificate of
authority under this chapter.
(2)  In the case of a sponsored captive insurance company:
(a)  the assets of a protected cell may not be used to pay an expense or claim
other than one attributable to the protected cell; and
(b)  the capital and surplus of the sponsored captive insurance company:
(i)  shall at all times be available to pay:
(A) an expense of the sponsored captive insurance company; or
(B) a claim against the sponsored captive insurance company; and
(ii)  may not be used to pay an expense or claim attributable to a protected
cell.
